Connecticut, session 2026, SB00368.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of
2 Emergency Services and Public Protection, in coordination with the
3 advisory committee established under subsection (b) of this section and
4 in accordance with the provisions of section 2 of this act, shall adopt and
5 administer a State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code based on
6 nationally recognized standards and codes. The code shall be revised at
7 the same time the State Building Code is revised pursuant to section 29-
8 252 of the general statutes, and as deemed necessary to incorporate any
9 subsequent revisions to such nationally recognized standards and codes
10 not later than eighteen months following the date of first publication of
11 such revisions. The State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code
12 shall include provisions for explosives, blasting, gunpowder, fireworks,
13 pyrotechnics and rockets.
14 (b) There is established, within the Department of Emergency
sSB368 / File No. 297 1

sSB368 File No. 297
15 Services and Public Protection, an advisory committee consisting of the
16 following eleven members: (1) The State Fire Marshal, or the marshal's
17 designee, (2) two members representing local fire marshals, deputy fire
18 marshals and fire inspectors, selected from a list of individuals
19 submitted by the Connecticut Fire Marshals Association, (3) five
20 members representing the Division of State Police within the
21 Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, (4) one
22 member representing the advisory committee established under
23 subsection (b) of section 29-291a of the general statutes, (5) one member
24 representing the Connecticut Career Fire Chiefs Association, and (6) one
25 member who has expertise in matters relating to the explosives or
26 pyrotechnics industry. All appointments to the advisory committee
27 shall be made by the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
28 Protection.
29 (c) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection
30 may issue official interpretations of the State Explosives, Blasting and
31 Pyrotechnic Code, including interpretations of the applicability of any
32 provision of the code, upon the request of any person. The
33 commissioner shall compile and index each interpretation and shall
34 publish such interpretations at periodic intervals not exceeding four
35 months.
36 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) For the purposes of this
37 section, "proposed code" means a proposal by the Commissioner of
38 Emergency Services and Public Protection, in coordination with the
39 advisory committee, for a new State Explosives, Blasting and
40 Pyrotechnic Code or for a change in, addition to or repeal of any
41 provision of the State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code and
42 "advisory committee" means the advisory committee established under
43 subsection (b) of section 1 of this act.
44 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 54 of the general
45 statutes, the adoption of the State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic
46 Code and any amendments thereto shall not be required to comply with
47 the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, except as provided
sSB368 / File No. 297 2

sSB368 File No. 297
48 in this section.
49 (c) Prior to the adoption of the State Explosives, Blasting and
50 Pyrotechnic Code and any amendments thereto, the Commissioner of
51 Emergency Services and Public Protection shall (1) post any proposed
52 code, a statement of purpose for which the proposed code is proposed,
53 a fiscal note associated with compliance with the proposed code
54 prepared pursuant to section 4-168 of the general statutes and a
55 regulatory flexibility analysis prepared pursuant to section 4-168a of the
56 general statutes on the Internet web site of the Department of
57 Emergency Services and Public Protection, (2) give notice electronically
58 to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
59 cognizance of matters relating to public safety and security, (3) give
60 notice to any person who has requested the commissioner for advance
61 notice of the proposed code adoption proceedings, (4) provide for a
62 public comment period of forty-five days following the posting of such
63 proposed code, statement of purpose, fiscal note and regulatory
64 flexibility analysis, and (5) hold a public hearing on the proposed code
65 not less than twenty nor more than thirty-five days after such posting.
66 (d) After the close of the public comment period, the Commissioner
67 of Emergency Services and Public Protection, in coordination with the
68 advisory committee, shall respond to each written and oral comment
69 regarding the proposed code received during the public comment
70 period and at the public hearing. Such response shall include any
71 change made to the proposed code, if applicable, and the rationale for
72 such change. The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
73 Protection shall post such responses on the Internet web site of the
74 Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection not later than
75 thirty days after the close of the public comment period.
76 (e) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
77 in coordination with the advisory committee, shall create and maintain
78 a code-making record for each proposed code, submit such code-
79 making record electronically to the standing legislative regulation
80 review committee and the joint standing committee of the General
sSB368 / File No. 297 3

sSB368 File No. 297
81 Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and
82 security and post such code-making record on the Internet web site of
83 the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection. Such
84 code-making record shall include, but need not be limited to: (1) The
85 final wording of the proposed code in a format consistent with
86 nationally recognized standards and codes, (2) the fiscal note prepared
87 pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, (3) the regulatory flexibility
88 analysis prepared pursuant to subsection (c) of this section, (4) all
89 written and oral comments received during the public comment period,
90 and (5) the responses to such comments prepared pursuant to
91 subsection (d) of this section.
92 (f) The standing legislative regulation review committee shall have
93 not more than forty-five days from the date the code-making record is
94 submitted to the committee pursuant to subsection (e) of this section to
95 convene a meeting to approve, disapprove or reject without prejudice
96 the proposed code, in whole or in part. If the proposed code is
97 withdrawn, the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
98 Protection shall resubmit the proposed code and the committee shall
99 have not more than forty-five days from the date of such resubmittal to
100 convene a meeting to approve, disapprove or reject without prejudice
101 the resubmitted proposed code. If the committee notifies the
102 Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection in writing
103 that it is waiving its right to convene a meeting or does not act on a
104 proposed code or a resubmitted proposed code, as the case may be,
105 within such forty-five-day period, the proposed code or resubmitted
106 proposed code shall be deemed to be approved by the committee.
107 (g) If the committee disapproves a proposed code, in whole or in part,
108 the committee shall notify the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
109 Public Protection of the disapproval and the reasons for the disapproval.
110 The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection shall
111 not take any action to implement such disapproved code, except that the
112 Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection may submit
113 a substantively new proposed code in accordance with the provisions of
114 this section, provided the General Assembly may reverse such
sSB368 / File No. 297 4

sSB368 File No. 297
115 disapproval in accordance with the provisions of section 4-171 of the
116 general statutes.
117 (h) If the committee rejects a proposed code without prejudice, in
118 whole or in part, the committee shall notify the Commissioner of
119 Emergency Services and Public Protection of the reasons for the
120 rejection and the Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public
121 Protection shall resubmit the proposed code in revised form to the
122 committee not later than thirty days after the date of rejection without
123 prejudice. Each resubmission of the proposed code under this
124 subsection shall include a summary of any revisions to the proposed
125 code. The committee shall have not more than forty-five days after the
126 receipt of the resubmittal to review and take action on such resubmitted
127 proposed code in the same manner as provided in subsection (f) of this
128 section.
129 (i) The State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code or any
130 amendment thereto approved or deemed approved by the committee
131 pursuant to subsection (f) of this section is effective and enforceable
132 against any person or party upon its posting on the Internet web site of
133 the Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, except
134 that: (1) If a later date is required by statute or specified in the code, the
135 later date is the effective date, and (2) a code may not be effective before
136 the effective date of the public act requiring or permitting the code. Such
137 posting shall include a statement by the Commissioner of Emergency
138 Services and Public Protection certifying that the electronic copy of the
139 code is a true and accurate copy of the code approved or deemed
140 approved in accordance with subsection (f) of this section. The electronic
141 copy of the State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code posted on
142 the Internet web site of the Department of Emergency Services and
143 Public Protection shall be the official version for all purposes, including
144 all legal and administrative proceedings.
145 (j) No provision of the State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic
146 Code or any amendment thereto adopted after October 1, 2026, is valid
147 unless adopted in substantial compliance with the requirements of this
sSB368 / File No. 297 5

sSB368 File No. 297
148 section. A proceeding to contest any provision of the code on the ground
149 of noncompliance with the requirements of this section shall be
150 commenced within two years from the effective date of the code.
151 (k) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection
152 shall advise the public concerning how to obtain a copy of the State
153 Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code and any amendments
154 thereto.
155 Sec. 3. Subsection (a) of section 29-349 of the general statutes is
156 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
157 1, 2026):
158 (a) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
159 in coordination with the advisory committee established under
160 subsection (b) of section 1 of this act and in accordance with the
161 provisions of section 2 of this act, shall [have exclusive jurisdiction in
162 the preparation of and may enforce reasonable] adopt regulations for
163 the safe and convenient storage, transportation and use of explosives
164 and blasting agents used in connection [therewith, which] with
165 explosives. Such regulations shall (1) be made part of the State
166 Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code adopted pursuant to section
167 1 of this act, (2) be enforced by the Commissioner of Emergency Services
168 and Public Protection, and (3) deal in particular with the quantity and
169 character of explosives and blasting agents to be stored, transported and
170 used, the proximity of such storage to inhabited dwellings or other
171 occupied buildings, public highways and railroad tracks, the character
172 and construction of suitable magazines for such storage, protective
173 measures to secure such stored explosives and blasting agents and the
174 abatement of any hazard that may arise incident to the storage,
175 transportation or use of such explosives and blasting agents.
176 Sec. 4. Subsection (b) of section 29-357 of the general statutes is
177 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
178 1, 2026):
179 (b) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
sSB368 / File No. 297 6

sSB368 File No. 297
180 in coordination with the advisory committee established under
181 subsection (b) of section 1 of this act and in accordance with the
182 provisions of section 2 of this act, shall adopt [reasonable] regulations [,
183 in accordance with chapter 54,] for the granting of permits for
184 supervised displays of fireworks or for the indoor use of pyrotechnics,
185 sparklers and fountains for special effects by municipalities, fair
186 associations, amusement parks, other organizations or groups of
187 individuals or artisans in pursuit of their trade. Such regulations shall
188 be made part of the State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code
189 adopted pursuant to section 1 of this act. Such permit may be issued
190 upon application to said commissioner and after (1) inspection of the
191 site of such display or use by the local fire marshal to determine
192 compliance with the requirements of such regulations, and (2) approval
193 of the chiefs of the police and fire departments, or, if there is no police
194 or fire department, of the first selectman, of the municipality wherein
195 the display is to be held as is provided in this section. No such display
196 shall be handled or fired by any person until such person has been
197 granted a certificate of competency by the Commissioner of Emergency
198 Services and Public Protection, in respect to which a fee of two hundred
199 dollars shall be payable to the State Treasurer when issued and which
200 may be renewed every three years upon payment of a fee of one
201 hundred ninety dollars payable to the State Treasurer, provided such
202 certificate may be suspended or revoked by said commissioner at any
203 time for cause. Such certificate of competency shall attest to the fact that
204 such operator is competent to fire a display. Such display shall be of
205 such a character and so located, discharged or fired as in the opinion of
206 the chiefs of the police and fire departments or such selectman, after
207 proper inspection, will not be hazardous to property or endanger any
208 person or persons. In an aerial bomb, no salute, report or maroon may
209 be used that is composed of a formula of chlorate of potash, sulphur,
210 black needle antimony and dark aluminum. Formulas that may be used
211 in a salute, report or maroon are as follows: (A) Perchlorate of potash,
212 black needle antimony and dark aluminum, and (B) perchlorate of
213 potash, dark aluminum and sulphur. No high explosive such as
214 dynamite, fulminate of mercury or other stimulator for detonating shall
sSB368 / File No. 297 7

sSB368 File No. 297
215 be used in any aerial bomb or other pyrotechnics. Application for
216 permits shall be made in writing at least fifteen days prior to the date of
217 display, on such notice as the Commissioner of Emergency Services and
218 Public Protection by regulation prescribes, on forms furnished by the
219 commissioner, and a fee of one hundred dollars shall be payable to the
220 State Treasurer with each such application. After such permit has been
221 granted, sales, possession, use and distribution of fireworks for such
222 display shall be lawful for that purpose only. No permit granted
223 hereunder shall be transferable. Any permit issued under the provisions
224 of this section may be suspended or revoked by the Commissioner of
225 Emergency Services and Public Protection or the local fire marshal for
226 violation by the permittee of any provision of the general statutes, any
227 regulation or any ordinance relating to fireworks.
228 Sec. 5. Subsection (a) of section 29-357a of the general statutes is
229 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
230 1, 2026):
231 (a) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
232 in coordination with the advisory committee established under
233 subsection (b) of section 1 of this act and in accordance with the
234 provisions of section 2 of this act, shall adopt regulations [, in accordance
235 with chapter 54,] for the granting of permits for supervised displays of
236 special effects produced by pyrotechnics, including sparklers and
237 fountains, or flame producing devices by municipalities, fair
238 associations, amusement parks, other organizations or groups of
239 individuals or artisans in pursuit of their trade. Such regulations (1)
240 shall be made part of the State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic
241 Code adopted pursuant to section 1 of this act, (2) shall include
242 provisions for determining the competency of persons intending to
243 discharge or fire such special effects, [. Such regulations] and (3) shall
244 not apply to ceremonial activities that include minimal use of
245 pyrotechnics or flame producing devices.
246 Sec. 6. Subsection (b) of section 29-359 of the general statutes is
247 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
sSB368 / File No. 297 8

sSB368 File No. 297
248 1, 2026):
249 (b) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
250 in coordination with the advisory committee established under
251 subsection (b) of section 1 of this act and in accordance with the
252 provisions of section 2 of this act, shall adopt regulations [in accordance
253 with the provisions of chapter 54] defining the term "pyrotechnics" for
254 purposes of subsection (a) of this section. Such regulations shall be made
255 part of the State Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code adopted
256 pursuant to section 1 of this act.
257 Sec. 7. Subsection (a) of section 29-367 of the general statutes is
258 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
259 1, 2026):
260 (a) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
261 in coordination with the advisory committee established under
262 subsection (b) of section 1 of this act and in accordance with the
263 provisions of section 2 of this act, shall adopt [, and may amend,
264 reasonable] regulations [, in accordance with the provisions of chapter
265 54,] concerning the safe design, construction, manufacture, testing,
266 certification, storage, sale, shipping, operation and launching of rockets
267 propelled by rocket motors, including, but not limited to, solid, liquid
268 and cold propellant, hybrid, steam or pressurized liquid rocket motors.
269 Such regulations shall (1) be made part of the State Explosives, Blasting
270 and Pyrotechnic Code adopted pursuant to section 1 of this act, and (2)
271 include provisions for the prevention of injury to life and damage to
272 property and protection of hazards incident to the design, construction,
273 manufacture, testing, storage, sale, shipping, operation and launching
274 of such rockets. The commissioner shall enforce such regulations.
275 Sec. 8. Section 4-173 of the general statutes is repealed and the
276 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
277 The Secretary of the State may omit from the regulations of
278 Connecticut state agencies posted on the eRegulations System (1) any
279 regulation of a federal agency or a government agency of another state
sSB368 / File No. 297 9

sSB368 File No. 297
280 that is incorporated by reference into a Connecticut regulation, (2) any
281 regulation that is incorporated by reference into a Connecticut
282 regulation and to which a third party holds the intellectual property
283 rights, (3) the State Building Code, (4) the State Fire Prevention Code,
284 [and] (5) the State Fire Safety Code, and (6) the State Explosives, Blasting
285 and Pyrotechnic Code. The Secretary of the State may post a link on the
286 eRegulations System to an electronic copy of the State Building Code,
287 the State Fire Prevention Code, the State Fire Safety Code, the State
288 Explosives, Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code and any document
289 incorporated by reference, if available and not prohibited by any state
290 or federal law, rule or regulation. Such link shall not be considered to be
291 a part of the official compilation of the regulations of Connecticut state
292 agencies. Each agency that incorporates a document by reference into a
293 regulation shall maintain a copy of such document readily available for
294 public inspection in the principal office of the agency, except for a
295 regulation of a federal agency or a government agency of another state
296 that is published by or otherwise available in printed or electronic form
297 from such federal or government agency. Copies of the State Building
298 Code, the State Fire Prevention Code and the State Fire Safety Code shall
299 be readily available for public inspection in the principal office of the
300 Department of Administrative Services. Copies of the State Explosives,
301 Blasting and Pyrotechnic Code shall be readily available for public
302 inspection in the principal office of the Department of Emergency
303 Services and Public Protection.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 3 October 1, 2026 29-349(a)
Sec. 4 October 1, 2026 29-357(b)
Sec. 5 October 1, 2026 29-357a(a)
Sec. 6 October 1, 2026 29-359(b)
Sec. 7 October 1, 2026 29-367(a)
Sec. 8 October 1, 2026 4-173
sSB368 / File No. 297 10

sSB368 File No. 297
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
Section 8 was added for consistency with similar provisions of the
general statutes.
PS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sSB368 / File No. 297 11

sSB368 File No. 297
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Emergency Services and Public GF - Cost 187,871 187,871
Protection, Dept.
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 78,568 78,568
Benefits1
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Department of Emergency Services and Public
Protection (DESPP) to adopt and administer a State Explosives, Blasting,
and Pyrotechnic Code, resulting in a cost of $266,439 annually for salary
and fringe benefits associated with one new Staff Attorney and one new
Paralegal Specialist. Developing, promulgating, and administering this
code would be a new function for the agency and it is anticipated that
DESPP will need these two new positions in its Legal Affairs Unit to
meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
sSB368 / File No. 297 12

sSB368 File No. 297
OLR Bill Analysis
sSB 368
AN ACT CONCERNING A STATE EXPLOSIVES, BLASTING AND
PYROTECHNIC CODE.